Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2603.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 3, article 7, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-610.03, to read: START_STATUTE41-610.03. Mobile veteran service units; rural and tribal veterans; quarterly reports; definitions A. The department shall provide mobile care services and telehealth services through mobile veteran service units to rural veterans and tribal veterans in this state who are unable to travel or who would need to travel long distances for basic health services. B. The department may employ staff to operate the mobile veteran service units that provide mobile care services and telehealth services. mobile veteran service units shall provide all of the following: 1. Monthly service visits to rural and tribal communities on a schedule published by the department. 2. Access to telehealth for veterans with disabilities. 3. Behavioral health services. 4. Veterans claims assistance. 5. Mental health referrals. 6. Any other care services that rural or tribal veterans require. C. Mobile veteran service units shall be compliant with the Americans with disabilities act and have accessible entrances and service equipment. D. The department shall set guidelines for determining the eligibility for rural veterans and tribal veterans in this state to qualify for any care services provided by the mobile veteran service units. E. The mobile veteran service units shall serve eligible veterans in all of the following: 1. Navajo county. 2. Apache county. 3. Coconino county. 4. Mohave county. 5. Yavapai county. 6. Gila county. F. On or before December 31, 2027 and quarterly thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives regarding all of the following: 1. The number of veterans who received aid. 2. The type of aid the veterans received. 3. The number of claims filed for veterans. 4. Any suggestions on how to improve aid to rural veterans and tribal veterans in this state. G. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Americans with disabilities act" means 42 United States Code sections 12101 through 12213, 47 United States Code sections 225 and 611 and the ADA amendments act of 2008 (P.L. 110-325; 122 Stat. 3553; 42 United States Code sections 13103 and 12205a). 2. "Rural veteran" means a veteran residing in a rural or frontier and remote area as determined by the United States department of agriculture, economic research service with limited access to department services. 3. "Tribal veteran" means a veteran residing on a federally recognized tribal nation in this state. END_STATUTE